Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,223
County; license or occupation tax; authorized; election.

A county may raise revenue by levying and collecting a license or occupation tax on any person, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or business engaged in the sale of admissions to recreational, cultural, entertainment, or concert events that are subject to sales tax under sections 77-2701.04 to 77-2713 that occur outside any incorporated municipality, but within the boundary limits of the county. The tax shall be uniform in respect to the class upon which it is imposed. The tax shall be based upon a certain percentage of gross receipts from sales in the county of the person, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or business, and may include sales of other goods and services at such locations and events, not to exceed one and one-half percent. A county may not impose the tax on sales that are within an incorporated city or village. No county shall levy and collect a license or occupation tax under this section unless approved by a majority of those voting on the question at a special, primary, or general election.

Laws 2002, LB 259, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 83;

Laws 2021, LB26, § 7;

Laws 2021, LB595, § 11;

Laws 2022, LB984, § 10;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 76;

Laws 2024, LB937, § 78.